Utah statutes.
17B-1-621.   Review of individual governmental fund budgets -- Hearing.

(1)  The board of trustees of a local district may, at any time during the budget year, review the individual budgets of the governmental funds for the purpose of determining if the total of any of them should be increased.

(2)  If the board of trustees decides that the budget total of one or more of these funds should be increased, it shall follow the procedures established in Sections 17B-1-609 and 17B-1-610 for holding a public hearing.

